lt-LT: USB standartas: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen 2x2; USB4; Kita
de: USB-Standard: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Padrão USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Geração 1; USB 3.2 Geração 1x1; USB 3.2 Geração 2; USB 3.2 Geração 2x1; USB 3.2 Geração 2x2; USB4; Outro
pl: Standard USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Inne
ro-RO: Standardul USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 1x1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen 2x2; USB4; Altele
tr: USB Standardı: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Diğer
bg-BG: USB стандарт: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 1x1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen 2x2; USB4; Други
th: มาตรฐาน Usb: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; อื่นๆ
ja: USB規格: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; その他
pt-BR: Padrão USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 geração 1; USB 3.2 geração 1x1; USB 3.2 geração 2; USB 3.2 geração 2x1; USB 3.2 geração 2x2; USB4; Outro
es: Estándar de USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Otros
el: Πρότυπο USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 1x1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen 2x2; USB4; Άλλο
en: USB standard: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 1x1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen 2x2; USB4; Other
fr: Norme USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 génération 1; USB 3.2 génération 1x1; USB 3.2 génération 2; USB 3.2 génération 2x1; USB 3.2 génération 2x2; USB4; Autre
fi: USB-standardi: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Muu
sv: USB-standard: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 1x1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen 2x2; USB4; Övrigt
it: Standard USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 1x1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen 2x2; USB4; Altro
zh-CN: USB 标准: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 第 1 代; USB 3.2 第 1x1 代; USB 3.2 第 2 代; USB 3.2 第 2x1 代; USB 3.2 第 2x2 代; USB4; 其他
zh-TW: 通用序列匯流排標準: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; 其他
vi: Tiêu chuẩn USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Khác
ru: Стандарт USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Другой
sl-SI: USB standard: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 1x1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen 2x2; USB4; Drugo
sk-SK: USB štandard: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen. 1x1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen. 2x2; USB4; Iné
nl: USB-standaard: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Andere
cs: Standard USB: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Jiné
da: USB-standard: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Andet
hu: USB-szabvány: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 1x1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB 3.2 gen 2x1; USB 3.2 gen 2x2; USB4; Egyéb
hr-HR: USB standard: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 prve generacije; USB 3.2 prve generacije x 1; USB 3.2 druge generacije; USB 3.2 druge generacije x 1; USB 3.2 druge generacije x 2; USB4; Ostalo
ko: USB 표준: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; 기타
nb: Usb-standard: USB 1.0; USB 1.1; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 1x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 3.2 Gen 2x1; USB 3.2 Gen 2x2; USB4; Annet